Utah statutes.
31A-1-102.   Purposes.

The purposes of the Insurance Code are to:

(1)  ensure the solidity of insurers doing business in Utah;

(2)  ensure that policyholders, claimants, and insurers are treated fairly and equitably;

(3)  ensure that Utah has an adequate and healthy insurance market, characterized by competitive conditions, the spirit of innovation, and the exercise of initiative;

(4)  provide for an insurance department that is expert in the field of insurance and able to enforce the Insurance Code effectively;

(5)  encourage cooperation between the Insurance Department and other Utah regulatory bodies, as well as other federal and state governmental entities;

(6)  preserve and improve state regulation of insurance;

(7)  maintain freedom of contract and enterprise;

(8)  encourage self regulation of the insurance industry;

(9)  encourage loss prevention as part of the insurance industry;

(10)  keep the public informed on insurance matters; and

(11)  achieve other purposes stated elsewhere in the Insurance Code.

